Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2119
Personal jurisdiction over lessor.

Leasing or offering to lease or arrange for a leasing of property under a consumer rental purchase agreement in this state shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the lessor in any action arising under the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act.

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 8.